da: Faldskærmsudspringsaktivitet: Basejumping; Svæveflyvning; Ballonspring i høj højde; Militær faldskærmsudspring; Faldskærmsakrobatik; Faldskærmsløb; Faldskærmsredning; Faldskærmsski; Faldskærmssurfing; Faldskærmstest; Paragliding; Skydiving; Røgspring; Andet
hu: Ejtőernyős tevékenység: Bázisugrás; Sárkányrepülés; Nagy magasságból végzett ejtőernyős ugrás; Katonai ejtőernyőzés; Ejtőernyős akrobatika; Ejtőernyős verseny; Ejtőernyős mentés; Ejtőernyős síelés; Ejtőernyős szörfözés; Ejtőernyő-tesztelés; Siklóernyőzés; Ejtőernyőzés; Füstugrás; Egyéb
tr: Paraşütle atlama aktivitesi: Yüksekten atlama; Planörle uçuş; Yüksek irtifada balondan atlama; Askeri paraşütle atlama; Paraşüt akrobasi; Paraşüt yarışı; Paraşüt kurtarma; Paraşütle kayak; Paraşütle sörf; Paraşüt testi; Yamaç paraşütü; Paraşütlü atlama; Dumanla atlama; Diğer
th: กิจกรรมกระโดดร่ม: เบสจัมพ์ปิ้ง; เล่นเครื่องร่อน; กระโดดจากบอลลูนบนที่สูง; ฝึกกระโดดร่มทางทหาร; กระโดดร่มผาดโผน; แข่งขันกระโดดร่ม; ช่วยเหลือด้วยการกระโดดร่ม; สกีกระโดดร่ม; โต้คลื่นกระโดดร่ม; การทดสอบกระโดดร่ม; ร่มร่อน; ดิ่งพสุธา; กระโดดร่มเพื่อดับไฟ; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 跳傘活動: 定點跳傘; 滑翔翼運動; 高空氣球跳傘; 軍事跳傘; 花式跳傘; 跳傘比賽; 跳傘競賽; 滑雪跳傘; 降落傘衝浪; 降落傘測試; 滑翔傘運動; 跳傘; 空降滅火; 其他
de: Fallschirmspringen: Basejumping; Drachenfliegen; Ballonspringen aus großer Höhe; Militärischer Fallschirmsprung; Fallschirmakrobatik; Fallschirmrennen; Rettung mit dem Fallschirm; Fallschirmspringen; Fallschirm-Surfen; Fallschirmtests; Gleitschirmfliegen; Fallschirmspringen; Feuerspringen; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 跳伞活动: 低空跳伞; 滑翔翼; 高空气球跳伞; 军事跳伞; 跳伞杂技; 跳伞竞赛; 跳伞救援; 跳伞滑雪; 跳伞冲浪; 跳伞试验; 滑翔伞; 跳伞运动; 空降消防; 其他
pt-PT: Atividade de paraquedismo: BASE jumping; Voo de asa-delta; Salto de balão em grande altitude; Paraquedismo militar; Acrobacias de paraquedas; Corrida de paraquedas; Salvamento de paraquedas; Esqui de paraquedas; Surf de paraquedas; Teste de paraquedas; Parapente; Paraquedismo; Smoke jumping; Outro
bg-BG: Парашутна дейност: БЕЙС джъмпинг; Делтапланеризъм; Скокове с балон от голяма височина; Военен парашутизъм; Акробатика с парашут; Състезания с парашут; Спасяване с парашут; Ски с парашут; Сърфиране с парашут; Тестване на парашут; Парапланеризъм; Скачане с парашут; Пожарникарски парашутизъм; Други
fr: Activité de parachutisme: Saut extrême; Deltaplane; Saut en ballon à haute altitude; Parachute militaire; Acrobaties en parachute; Course de parachute; Sauvetage en parachute; Ski parachutiste; Surf en parachute; Tests de parachutes; Parapente; Parachutisme; Saut de fumée; Autre
pt-BR: Atividade de paraquedismo: BASE jumping; Asa delta; Salto de balão em altitude; Paraquedismo militar; Acrobacias de paraquedas; Corrida de paraquedas; Resgate por paraquedas; Esqui de paraquedas; Surf de paraquedas; Teste de paraquedas; Paragliding; Paraquedismo; Bombeiro paraquedista; Outro
ko: 낙하산 활동: 베이스 점프; 행글라이딩; 고공 열기구 점프; 군인 강하; 낙하산 곡예; 낙하산 경주; 낙하산 구조; 낙하산 스키; 낙하산 서핑; 낙하산 테스트; 패러글라이딩; 스카이다이빙; 스모크 점프; 기타
ru: Парашютный спорт: Бейсджампинг; Дельтапланеризм; Прыжки с воздушного шара на большой высоте; Военный парашютный спорт; Парашютная акробатика; Парашютные гонки; Парашютно-спасательная подготовка; Катание на лыжах с парашютом; Серфинг с парашютом; Испытание парашюта; Парапланеризм; Прыжки с парашютом; Пожарный парашютизм; Другой
sl-SI: Padalska dejavnost: BASE skoki; Zmajarstvo; Visokogorski skoki z balonom; Vojaško padalstvo; Padalske akrobacije; Padalske dirke; Reševanje s padalom; Smučanje s padalom; Deskanje s padalom; Testiranje padal; Jadralno padalstvo; Skok s padalom; Padalsko gasilstvo; Drugo
en: Parachuting activity: BASE jumping; Hang gliding; High altitude balloon jumping; Military parachuting; Parachute acrobatics; Parachute racing; Parachute rescue; Parachute skiing; Parachute surfing; Parachute testing; Paragliding; Skydiving; Smoke jumping; Other
ja: パラシュートアクティビティ: ベースジャンプ; ハンググライダー; 高高度気球ジャンプ; ミリタリーパラシュート; パラシュートアクロバット; パラシュートレース; パラシュートレスキュー; パラシュートスキー; パラシュートサーフィン; パラシュートテスト; パラグライダー; スカイダイビング; スモークジャンプ; その他
ro-RO: Activitate de parașutism: Sărituri cu parașuta de pe obiecte fixe; Deltaplanorism; Sărituri cu balonul de la mare înălțime; Parașutism militar; Acrobații cu parașuta; Curse de parașute; Salvare cu parașuta; Schi cu parașuta; Surfing cu parașuta; Testare cu parașuta; Parapantă; Skydiving; Sărituri cu parașuta pentru stingerea incendiilor; Altele
it: Paracadutismo: BASE jumping; Deltaplano; Salto ad alta quota; Paracadutismo militare; Acrobazie con il paracadute; Gara con il paracadute; Salvataggio con paracadute; Sci con paracadute; Surf con paracadute; Prova del paracadute; Parapendio; Skydiving; Paracadutismo; Altro
sv: Fallskärmshoppningsaktivitet: BASE-hoppning; Glidflygning; Ballonghoppning på hög höjd; Militär fallskärmshoppning; Fallskärmsakrobatik; Fallskärmsracing; Fallskärmsräddning; Fallskärmsskidåkning; Fallskärmssurfning; Fallskärmstestning; Skärmflygning; Fallskärmshoppning; Smoke jumping; Övrigt
es: Actividad de paracaidismo: Salto BASE; Ala delta; Salto en globo a gran altura; Paracaidismo militar; Acrobacias en paracaídas; Carrera de paracaídas; Rescate en paracaídas; Esquí con paracaídas; Surf con paracaídas; Pruebas de paracaídas; Parapente; Paracaidismo; Salto de humo; Otros
nb: Fallskjermhoppingsaktivitet: Basehopping; Hangglidere; Ballonghopping i stor høyde; Militær fallskjermhopping; Fallskjermakrobatikk; Fallskjermløp; Fallskjermredning; Paraski; Kiting; Fallskjermtesting; Paragliding; Fallskjermhopping; Røykdykking; Annet
el: Δραστηριότητα πρώτης με αλεξίπτωτο: Ελεύθερη πτώση; Αιωρόπτερο; Πτώση από αερόστατο σε μεγάλο υψόμετρο; Στρατιωτική πτώση με αλεξίπτωτο; Ακροβατικά σε πτώση με αλεξίπτωτο; Αγώνες με αλεξίπτωτο; Διάσωση με αλεξίπτωτο; Σκι με αλεξίπτωτο; Σερφ με αλεξίπτωτο; Δοκιμή αλεξίπτωτου; Αλεξίπτωτο πλαγιάς; Αλεξιπτωτισμός ελεύθερης πτώσης; Smoke jumping; Άλλο
sk-SK: Parašutistická aktivita: BASE jumping; Závesné lietanie; Skákanie balónom vo vysokej nadmorskej výške; Vojenský parašutizmus; Akrobacia na padáku; Preteky na padákoch; Záchrana na padáku; Padákové lyžovanie; Parašutistické surfovanie; Testovanie padákov; Paragliding; Skydiving; Parašutistické hasenie; Iné
hr-HR: Padobranska aktivnost: BASE skakanje; Letenje zmajem; Skakanje balonom iz stratosfere; Vojno padobranstvo; Padobranske akrobacije; Padobranske utrke; Spašavanje padobranom; Skijanje s padobranom; Surfanje s padobranom; Ispitivanje padobrana; Paragliding; Padobranstvo; Vatrogasno padobranstvo; Ostalo
nl: Parachutespringen: Basejumpen; Deltavliegen; Ballonspringen op grote hoogte; Militair parachutespringen; Parachute-acrobatiek; Parachuteracen; Parachuteredding; Parachuteskiën; Parachutesurfen; Parachutetesten; Paragliding; Parachutespringen; Vuurspringen; Andere
pl: Spadochroniarstwo: Base jumping; Lotniarstwo; Skoki balonowe na dużej wysokości; Spadochroniarstwo wojskowe; Akrobacje spadochronowe; Wyścigi spadochronowe; Ratownictwo spadochronowe; Narciarstwo spadochronowe; Surfowanie ze spadochronem; Testy spadochronowe; Paralotniarstwo; Skydiving; Skoki w dymie; Inne
fi: Laskuvarjohyppytoiminta: BASE-hyppääminen; Riippuliito; Ilmapallohypyt korkealta; Armeijan laskuvarjohyppy; Laskuvarjoakrobatia; Laskuvarjokilpailu; Laskuvarjopelastus; Laskuvarjohiihto; Laskuvarjosurffaus; Laskuvarjotestau; Varjoliito; Laskuvarjourheilu; Laskuvarjopalontorjunta; Muu
lt-LT: Parašiutų sportas: BASE sklendimas; Sklandymas; Šuolis iš baliono dideliame aukštyje; Šuolis kariniu parašiutu; Parašiutinė akrobatika; Parašiutų lenktynės; Avarinis šuolis parašiutu; Slidinėjimas su parašiutu; Banglenčių sportas su parašiutu; Parašiutų bandymai; Parasparnių sportas; Šuoliai su parašiutu; Ugniagesiai-parašiutininkai; Kita
vi: Hoạt động nhảy dù: Nhảy cơ bản; Diều lượn; Nhảy khinh khí cầu trên cao; Nhảy dù quân sự; Nhào lộn dù; Đua dù; Nhảy dù bảo hộ; Trượt tuyết bằng dù; Lướt ván dù; Thử nghiệm nhảy dù; Dù lượn; Nhảy dù; Nhân viên cứu hỏa; Khác
cs: Parašutistická disciplína: BASE jumping; Závěsné létání; Skákání z balónu ve vysoké nadmořské výšce; Vojenský parašutismus; Akrobacie na padáku; Parašutistické závody; Parašutistická záchrana; Lyžování s padákem; Surfování s padákem; Testování padáku; Paragliding; Skydiving; Smoke jumping; Jiné